Oklahoma, session 2025, SB756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-117.8 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Local


Teacher Licensure Act”. The purpose of the Local Teacher Licensure


Act shall be to grant school district boards of education the

Req. No. 1302 Page 1


authority to evaluate and recommend teacher licensure or


certification applications. The State Board of Education shall


maintain final oversight and ratification authority over the


issuance of teacher licenses or certificates in compliance with


Section 5 of Article XIII of the Oklahoma Constitution and Section


3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. School district boards of education are hereby authorized to


evaluate and recommend approval of teacher licensure or


certification applications to the State Board of Education based on


the standards set forth in Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. Upon receiving a recommendation for licensure or


certification from a school district board of education, the State


Board of Education shall:


1. Review the recommendation for completeness and compliance


with statutory requirements including, but not limited to, Sections


5-142, 6-107, 6-122.3, 6-187, and 6-190 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


2. Approve or reject the licensure or certification


recommendations within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt; and


3. Provide written notification of approval or rejection to the


recommending school district board of education and the licensure or


certification applicant.


D. Failure of the State Board of Education to act on a


recommendation within thirty (30) calendar days pursuant to

Req. No. 1302 Page 2


subsection C of this section shall result in the Board’s automatic


approval of the license or certificate; provided, however, that the


recommendation submitted by the school district board of education


meets all statutory and procedural requirements set forth in Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes and the rules promulgated by the Board.


E. Teacher licenses or certificates issued pursuant to the


provisions of this section shall be valid for a term of five (5)


years from the date of issuance and shall be subject to renewal in


accordance with the provisions of Section 6-108.1 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


F. The State Board of Education shall retain oversight of all


teacher licensure or certification processes, and the State


Department of Education shall maintain all records regarding teacher


licenses or certificates issued pursuant to this section.


G. School district boards of education shall establish


transparent procedures for licensure or certification


recommendations including:


1. Timelines for application submission, which shall provide


teacher license or certificate applicants with a minimum of twenty


(20) calendar days to complete the process;


2. A timeline for board of education review and approval or


rejection, not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days from the date of


application submission; and



Req. No. 1302 Page 3


3. Written notification to the teacher license or certificate


applicant and the State Department of Education within five (5)


business days of the board of education’s decision.


H. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1302 EB 1/19/2025 5:42:40 AM

























Req. No. 1302 Page 4